Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.430

Moneys from Inland Power & Light company to be deposited in general fund.

All monies [moneys] received from the Inland Power & Light company, its successors and assigns, in virtue of an agreement made and entered into between said company and the State of Washington on August 31, 1932, relating to a fish hatchery on Lewis river, shall be deposited in the general fund.

[ 1980 c 32 s 1; 1933 c 123 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1980 c 32 s 1: "Section 1 of this act shall take effect September 1, 1981." [ 1980 c 32 s 2.]